pl: Wejścia/wyjścia CV/Gate syntezatora analogowego: Wyjście Aftertouch CV; Wejście CV; Wyjście CV; Wejście Gate; Wyjście Gate; Hz/V; Wyjście Mod wheel CV; Brak CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/okt.); Wejście Sync/Clock; Wyjście Sync/Clock; Inne
tr: Analog sentezleyici CV/Gate Giriş/Çıkış: Aftertouch CV çıkışı; CV girişi; CV çıkışı; Gate girişi; Gate çıkışı; Hz/V; Modülasyon tekerleği CV çıkışı; CV/Gate yok; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Senkronizasyon/Clock girişi; Senkronizasyon/Clock çıkışı; Diğer
el: Αναλογικό συνθεσάιζερ CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV out; CV in; CV out; Gate in; Gate out; Hz/V; Mod wheel CV out; Χωρίς CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Sync/Clock in; Sync/Clock out; Άλλο
ro-RO: Intrări/ieșiri tensiune de control/poartă pentru sintetizatoarele analogice: Ieșire CV Aftertouch; Intrare CV; Ieșire CV; Intrare Gate; Ieșire Gate; Hz/V; Ieșire CV Mod wheel; Fără CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Intrare Sync/Clock; Ieșire Sync/Clock; Altele
hu: Analóg szintetizátor CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV kimenet; CV bemenet; CV kimenet; Gate bemenet; Gate kimenet; Hz/V; Modulációs kerék CV kimenet; Nincs CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/okt); Szinkron/órajel bemenet; Szinkron/órajel kimenet; Egyéb
th: อินพุต/เอาต์พุต CV/Gate สำหรับซินธิไซเซอร์แบบอนาล็อก: Aftertouch CV Out; CV In; CV Out; Gate In; Gate Out; Hz/V; Mod Wheel CV Out; ไม่มี CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Sync/Clock In; Sync/Clock Out; อื่นๆ
da: Analog synthesizer CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV-udgang; CV-indgang; CV-udgang; Gate-indgang; Gate-udgang; Hz/V; Mod-hjul CV-udgang; Ingen CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/okt); Sync/Clock-indgang; Sync/Clock-udgang; Andet
nb: Analog synthesizer CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV ut; CV inn; CV ut; Gate inn; Gate ut; Hz/V; Modulasjonshjul CV ut; Ingen CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/okt); Synkronisering/klokke inn; Synkronisering/klokke ut; Annet
fr: Entrées/sorties CV/Gate pour synthétiseur analogique: Sortie CV d’aftertouch; Entrée CV; Sortie CV; Entrée Gate; Sortie Gate; Hz/V; Sortie CV de molette de modulation; Pas de CV/Gate; CV de hauteur (1 V/oct); Entrée Sync/Horloge; Sortie Sync/Horloge; Autre
sk-SK: Analógový syntetizátor CV/Gate I/O: Výstup CV pre aftertouch; Vstup CV; Výstup CV; Vstup Gate; Výstup Gate; Hz/V; Výstup CV modulačného kolieska; Bez CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/oktáva); Vstup pre synchronizáciu/hodiny; Výstup pre synchronizáciu/hodiny; Iné
hr-HR: Kontrolni napon i priključci (Gate I/O) analognog sintesajzera: Izlaz Aftertouch CV; Ulaz CV; Izlaz CV; Ulaz Gate; Izlaz Gate; Hz/V; Izlaz kotačića za modulaciju CV; Bez CV/Gatea; Pitch CV (1 V/okt); Ulaz Sync/Clock; Izlaz Sync/Clock; Ostalo
cs: Analogový syntezátor CV/Gate I/O: Výstup CV aftertouch; Vstup CV; Výstup CV; Vstup Gate; Výstup Gate; Hz/V; Výstup CV modulačního kolečka; Bez CV/Gate; CV výšky tónu (1 V/okt); Vstup Sync/Clock; Výstup Sync/Clock; Jiné
pt-BR: Entrada/saída CV/Gate de sintetizador analógico: Saída Aftertouch CV; Entrada CV; Saída CV; Entrada Gate; Saída Gate; Hz/V; Saída Mod wheel CV; Sem CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/oitava); Entrada Sync/Clock; Saída Sync/Clock; Outro
fi: Analoginen syntetisaattori CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV out; CV in; CV out; Gate in; Gate out; Hz/V; Mod-pyörän CV out; Ei CV/Gate-liitäntöjä; Pitch CV (1V/okt); Sync/Clock in; Sync/Clock out; Muu
zh-TW: 類比合成器 CV/Gate 輸入/輸出: 觸後 CV 輸出; CV 輸入; CV 輸出; 閘門輸入; 閘門輸出; Hz/V; 調變輪 CV 輸出; 無 CV/Gate; 音高 CV (1V/oct); 同步/時脈輸入; 同步/時脈輸出; 其他
sv: Analog synt CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV ut; CV in; CV ut; Gate in; Gate ut; Hz/V; Mod-hjul CV ut; Ingen CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/okt); Synk/klocka in; Synk/klocka ut; Annat
de: CV/Gate I/O für analoge Synthesizer: Aftertouch CV-Ausgang; CV-Eingang; CV-Ausgang; Gate-Eingang; Gate-Ausgang; Hz/V; Modwheel-CV-Ausgang; Kein CV/Gate; Pitch-CV (1 V/Okt.); Sync/Clock-Eingang; Sync/Clock-Ausgang; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vhodi in izhodi CV/Gate: Izhod CV za aftertouch; Vhod CV; Izhod CV; Vhod Gate; Izhod Gate; Hz/V; Izhod CV za modulacijsko kolesce; Brez CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/okt.); Vhod Sync/Clock; Izhod Sync/Clock; Drugo
zh-CN: 模拟合成器 CV/Gate 输入/输出: 触后 CV 输出; CV 输入; CV 输出; Gate 输入; Gate 输出; Hz/V; 调制轮 CV 输出; 无 CV/Gate; 音高 CV (1V/oct); 同步/时钟输入; 同步/时钟输出; 其他
vi: Đầu vào/đầu ra CV/Gate của bộ tổng hợp âm thanh tương tự: Ngõ ra Aftertouch CV; Ngõ vào CV; Ngõ ra CV; Ngõ vào Gate; Ngõ ra Gate; Hz/V; Ngõ ra Mod wheel CV; Không có CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Ngõ vào Sync/Clock; Ngõ ra Sync/Clock; Khác
en: Analog synthesizer CV/Gate I/O: Aftertouch CV out; CV in; CV out; Gate in; Gate out; Hz/V; Mod wheel CV out; No CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Sync/Clock in; Sync/Clock out; Other
bg-BG: CV/Gate входове и изходи на аналогов синтезатор: Aftertouch CV изход; CV вход; CV изход; Gate вход; Gate изход; Hz/V; Mod wheel CV изход; Без CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Вход за Sync/Clock; Изход за Sync/Clock; Друго
ko: 아날로그 신디사이저 CV/게이트 입출력: 애프터터치 CV 출력; CV 입력; CV 출력; 게이트 입력; 게이트 출력; Hz/V; 모듈레이션 휠 CV 출력; CV/게이트 없음; 피치 CV(1V/oct); 동기화/클럭 입력; 동기화/클럭 출력; 기타
nl: CV/Gate-I/O analoge synthesizer: Aftertouch CV-out; CV-in; CV-out; Gate-in; Gate-out; Hz/V; Modulatiewiel CV-out; Geen CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1V/oct); Sync/Clock-in; Sync/Clock-out; Overig
pt-PT: Sintetizador analógico CT/Gate Entrada/Saída: Saída CV de aftertouch; Entrada CV; Saída CV; Entrada Gate; Saída Gate; Hz/V; Saída CV da roda de modulação; Sem CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/oitava); Entrada Sync/Clock; Saída Sync/Clock; Outro
lt-LT: Analoginis sintezatorius CV / įvesties / išvesties vartai: „Aftertouch“ CV išvestis; CV įvestis; CV išvestis; „Gate“ įvestis; „Gate“ išvestis; Hz/V; Moduliavimo ratuko CV išvestis; Be CV / „Gate“; Aukščio CV (1V/okt.); Sinchronizavimo / takto įvestis; Sinchronizavimo / takto išvestis; Kita
ja: アナログシンセサイザーのCV／ゲート入出力: アフタータッチ CV out; CV in; CV out; Gate in; Gate out; Hz/V; モジュレーションホイール CV out; CV/Gateなし; ピッチ CV (1V/oct); Sync/Clock in; Sync/Clock out; その他
ru: Входы/выходы CV/Gate аналогового синтезатора: Выход Aftertouch CV; Вход CV; Выход CV; Вход Gate; Выход Gate; Гц/В; Выход колеса модуляции CV; Без CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 В/окт); Вход Sync/Clock; Выход Sync/Clock; Другое
it: Sintetizzatore analogico CV/Gate I/O: CV out aftertouch; CV in; CV out; Gate in; Gate out; Hz/V; CV out mod wheel; Nessun CV/Gate; Pitch CV (1 V/oct); Sync/Clock in; Sync/Clock out; Altro
es: Entrada/salida CV/Gate del sintetizador analógico: Salida CV de aftertouch; Entrada CV; Salida CV; Entrada Gate; Salida Gate; Hz/V; Salida CV de rueda de modulación; Sin CV/Gate; CV de tono (1V/oct); Entrada Sync/Clock; Salida Sync/Clock; Otro